Oklahoma, session 2026, SB320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 420, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 182, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 420), is amended to read as follows:


Section 420. A. A person in possession of a state-issued


medical marijuana patient license shall be able to:


1. Consume marijuana legally;


2. Legally possess up to three (3) ounces or eighty-four and


nine-tenths (84.9) grams of marijuana on their person;


3. Legally possess six mature marijuana plants and the


harvested marijuana therefrom;


4. Legally possess six seedling plants;



Req. No. 35 Page 1


5. Legally possess one (1) ounce or twenty-eight and three


tenths (28.3) grams of concentrated marijuana;


6. Legally possess seventy-two (72) ounces or two thousand


thirty-seven and six-tenths (2037.6) grams of edible marijuana;


7. Legally possess up to eight (8) ounces or two hundred


twenty-six and four-tenths (226.4) grams of marijuana in their


residence; and


8. Legally possess seventy-two (72) ounces of topical


marijuana; and


9. Legally purchase no more than two and one-half (2.5) ounces


or seventy and nine-tenths (70.9) grams of marijuana in a one-week


period.


B. Possession of up to one and one-half (1.5) ounces or forty-


two and forty-five one-hundredths (42.45) grams of marijuana by


persons who can state a medical condition, but are not in possession


of a state-issued medical marijuana patient license, shall


constitute a misdemeanor offense punishable by a fine not to exceed


Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) and shall not be subject to


imprisonment for the offense. Any law enforcement officer who comes


in contact with a person in violation of this subsection and who is


satisfied as to the identity of the person, as well as any other


pertinent information the law enforcement officer deems necessary,


shall issue to the person a written citation containing a notice to


answer the charge against the person in the appropriate court. Upon

Req. No. 35 Page 2


receiving the written promise of the alleged violator to answer as


specified in the citation, the law enforcement officer shall release


the person upon personal recognizance unless there has been a


violation of another provision of law.


C. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority shall be


established which shall receive applications for medical marijuana


patient and caregiver license recipients, dispensaries, growers, and


processors within sixty (60) days of the passage of this initiative.


D. The Authority shall, within thirty (30) days of passage of


this initiative, make available on its website, in an easy-to-find


location, an application for a medical marijuana patient license.


The license shall be valid for two (2) years. The biannual


application fee shall be One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or Twenty


Dollars ($20.00) for individuals on Medicaid, Medicare or


SoonerCare. The methods of payment shall be provided on the website


of the Authority. Reprints of the medical marijuana patient license


shall be Twenty Dollars ($20.00).


E. A short-term medical marijuana patient license application


shall also be made available on the website of the Authority. A


short-term medical marijuana patient license shall be granted to any


applicant who can meet the requirements for a two-year medical


marijuana patient license, but whose physician recommendation for


medical marijuana is only valid for sixty (60) days. Short-term


medical marijuana patient licenses shall be issued for sixty (60)

Req. No. 35 Page 3


days. The fee for a short-term medical marijuana patient license,


reprints of the short-term medical marijuana patient license, and


the procedure for extending or renewing the license shall be


determined by the Executive Director of the Authority.


F. A temporary medical marijuana patient license application


shall also be made available on the website of the Authority for


residents of other states. Temporary medical marijuana patient


licenses shall be granted to any medical marijuana license holders


from other states, provided that such states have state-regulated


medical marijuana programs, and applicants can prove they are


members of such programs. Temporary medical marijuana patient


licenses shall be issued for thirty (30) days. The cost for a


temporary license shall be One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). Renewal


shall be granted with resubmission of a new application. No


additional criteria shall be required. Reprints of the temporary


medical marijuana patient license shall be Twenty Dollars ($20.00).


G. Medical marijuana patient license applicants shall submit


their applications to the Authority for approval. The applicant


shall be a resident of this state and shall prove residency by a


valid driver license, utility bills, or other accepted methods.


H. The Authority shall review the medical marijuana patient


license application; approve, reject, or deny the application; and


mail the approval, rejection, or denial letter stating any reasons


for rejection, to the applicant within fourteen (14) business days

Req. No. 35 Page 4


of receipt of the application. Approved applicants shall be issued


a medical marijuana patient license which shall act as proof of his


or her approved status. Applications may only be rejected or denied


based on the applicant not meeting stated criteria or improper


completion of the application.


I. The Authority shall make available, both on its website and


through a telephone verification system, an easy method to validate


the authenticity of the medical marijuana patient license by the


unique twenty-four-character identification number.


J. The Authority shall ensure that all medical marijuana


patient and caregiver records and information are sealed to protect


the privacy of medical marijuana patient license applicants.


K. A caregiver license shall be made available for qualified


caregivers of a medical marijuana patient license holder who is


homebound. As provided in Section 427.11 of this title, the


caregiver license shall provide the caregiver the same rights as the


medical marijuana patient licensee including the ability to possess


marijuana, marijuana products and mature and immature plants or


cultivated medical marijuana pursuant to the Oklahoma Medical


Marijuana and Patient Protection Act, but excluding the ability to


use marijuana or marijuana products unless the caregiver has a


medical marijuana patient license. Applicants for a caregiver


license shall submit proof of the license status and homebound


status of the medical marijuana patient and proof that the applicant

Req. No. 35 Page 5


is the designee of the medical marijuana patient. The applicant


shall also submit proof that he or she is eighteen (18) years of age


or older and proof of his or her state residency. This shall be the


only criteria for a caregiver license. A licensed caregiver shall


not cultivate medical marijuana for more than five medical marijuana


patient licensees and shall not charge a medical marijuana patient


licensee for cultivating medical marijuana in excess of the actual


costs incurred in cultivating the medical marijuana.


L. All applicants for a medical marijuana patient license shall


be eighteen (18) years of age or older. A special exception shall


be granted to an applicant under the age of eighteen (18); however,


these applications shall be signed by two physicians and the parent


or legal guardian of the applicant.


M. All applications for a medical marijuana patient license


shall be signed by an Oklahoma physician licensed by and in good


standing with the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision,


the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, or the Board of Podiatric


Medical Examiners. There are no qualifying conditions. A medical


marijuana patient license shall be recommended according to the


accepted standards a reasonable and prudent physician would follow


when recommending or approving any medication. No physician may be


unduly stigmatized, penalized, subjected to discipline, sanctioned,


reprimanded or harassed for signing a medical marijuana patient


license application;, provided, the physician acted in accordance

Req. No. 35 Page 6


with the provisions of this subsection and all other rules governing


the medical license of the physician in this state.


N. Counties and cities may enact medical marijuana guidelines


allowing medical marijuana patient license holders or caregiver


license holders to exceed the state limits set forth in subsection A


of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-35 CAD 12/31/2024 12:05:27 PM































Req. No. 35 Page 7